Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.240

Local government accounting—Public officers and employees—Duty to account and report—Removal from office—Deposit of collections.

Every public officer and employee of a local government shall keep all accounts of his or her office in the form prescribed and make all reports required by the state auditor. Any public officer or employee who refuses or willfully neglects to perform such duties shall be subject to removal from office in an appropriate proceeding for that purpose brought by the attorney general or by any prosecuting attorney.

Every public officer and employee, whose duty it is to collect or receive payments due or for the use of the public shall deposit such moneys collected or received by him or her with the treasurer of the local government once every twenty-four consecutive hours. The treasurer may in his or her discretion grant an exception where such daily transfers would not be administratively practical or feasible as long as the treasurer has received a written request from the department, district, or agency, and where the department, district, or agency certifies that the money is held with proper safekeeping and that the entity carries out proper theft protection to reduce risk of loss of funds. Exceptions granted by the treasurer shall state the frequency with which deposits are required as long as no exception exceeds a time period greater than one deposit per week.

In case a public officer or employee collects or receives funds for the account of a local government of which he or she is an officer or employee, the treasurer shall, by Friday of each week, pay to the proper officer of the local government for the account of which the collection was made or payment received, the full amount collected or received during the current week for the account of the district.

[ 2002 c 168 s 3; 1995 c 301 s 13; 1991 c 245 s 13; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.240. Prior: 1963 c 209 s 2; 1911 c 30 s 1; 1909 c 76 s 6; RRS s 9956; prior: 1890 p 638 s 11; Code 1881 s 2577; 1854 p 411 s 7.]